cs: Tuhost štětin: Extra tvrdé; Tvrdé; Středně tvrdé; Měkké; Jiné
hr-HR: Čvrstoća čekinja: Ekstra čvrsto; Čvrsto; Srednja; Meka; Ostalo
it: Rigidità delle setole: Extra fermo; Compatto; Medio; Morbida; Altro
pt-PT: Rigidez das cerdas: Extra firme; Firme; Médio; Suave; Outro
vi: Độ cứng của lông bàn chải: Cực chắc; Chắc; Vừa; Mềm; Khác
de: Borstensteifigkeit: Extra fest; Kräftig; Medium; Weich; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Šerelių standumas: Itin tvirtas; Tvirtas; Vidutinis; Švelnus; Kita
da: Børstehårsstivhed: Ekstra fast; Fast; Medium; Blød; Andet
nb: Børstestivhet: Ekstra fast; Fast; Middels; Myk; Annet
sl-SI: Togost ščetin: Zelo čvrsta; Čvrsta; Srednja; Mehka; Druga
zh-TW: 刷毛硬度: 額外結實; 結實; 中等; 柔軟; 其他
hu: Sörték merevsége: Extra kemény; Kemény; Közepes; Puha; Egyéb
fr: Rigidité des poils: Extra ferme; Ferme; Moyen; Doux; Autre
ro-RO: Rigiditatea perilor: Extra rigid; Rigid; Mediu; Moale; Altele
es: Rigidez de las cerdas: Extrafirme; Firme; Medio; Blanda; Otros
th: ความแข็งของขนแปรง: แข็งมาก; แข็ง; ปานกลาง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
pl: Sztywność włosia: Bardzo twarde; Twarde; Średnie; Miękkie; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Tuhosť štetín: Extra pevný; Pevný; Stredný; Mäkký; Iné
pt-BR: Rigidez das cerdas: Extra firme; Firme; Média; Macia; Outro
sv: Borststyvhet: Extra fast; Fast; Medium; Mjuk; Övrigt
tr: Kıl sertliği: Ekstra sert; Sert; Orta; Yumuşak; Diğer
ru: Жесткость щетины: Очень жесткая; Жесткая; Средняя; Мягкая; Другая
ja: 毛の硬さ: 超硬め; 硬め; 中くらい; 柔らかめ; その他
bg-BG: Твърдост на четката: Изключително твърдо; Твърдо; Средно; Меко; Друго
nl: Stijfheid van de borstelharen: Extra stevig; Stevig; Medium; Zacht; Overig
el: Σκληρότητα ινών βούρτσας: Πολύ σκληρές; Σκληρές; Μεσαίες; Μαλακές; Άλλο
ko: 브러시 강모 강도: 매우 단단함; 단단함; 중간; 부드러움; 기타
en: Bristle stiffness: Extra firm; Firm; Medium; Soft; Other
fi: Harjasten jäykkyys: Erittäin jäykkä; Jäykkä; Keskijäykkä; Pehmeä; Muu
zh-CN: 刷毛硬度: 特硬; 硬; 中等; 软; 其他